Hawaii statutes.
§183-45 Accreted land. No structure,
retaining wall, dredging, grading, or other use which interferes or may
interfere with the future natural course of the beach, including further
accretion or erosion, shall be permitted on accreted land as judicially decreed
under section 501-33 or 669-1(e). This section shall not in any way be
construed to affect state or county property.

Any structure or action in violation of this
section shall be immediately removed or stopped and the property owner shall be
fined in accordance with section 183C-7. Any action taken to impose or collect
the penalty provided for in this section shall be considered a civil action. [L
1985, c 221, §1; am L 1995, c 11, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next